Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.160

Rule-making proceedings.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter must be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310 and 43.135.055 and chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when the proposed rule is subject to a referendum.

(3) Rules, regulations, and orders made by the commission must be filed with the director and become effective as provided in RCW 34.05.380.

[ 2009 c 33 s 16.]